Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-961
Entry upon land.

The director, any control authority, any weed control superintendent, or anyone authorized thereby may enter upon all land under his, her, or its respective jurisdiction for the purpose of performing the duties and exercising the powers under the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the director and the Noxious Weed Control Act, including the taking of specimens of weeds or other materials, without the consent of the person owning or controlling such land and without being subject to any action for trespass or damages, including damages for destruction of growing crops, if reasonable care is exercised.

Laws 1965, c. 7, § 10, p. 86;

Laws 1987, LB 1, § 5;

Laws 1987, LB 138, § 10;

Laws 1989, LB 49, § 11.